District of Columbia statutes.
47-1360

Right of redemption.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, an owner or other person who has an interest in the real property sold by the Mayor may redeem the real property at any time until the foreclosure of the right of redemption is final.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).